New York, session 2025-2026, S8455.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The penal law is amended by adding two new sections 265.67 2 and 265.68 to read as follows: 3 § 265.67 Criminal sale of a flare gun in the second degree. 4 A person, firm, corporation, dealer, or other entity is guilty of 5 criminal sale of a flare gun in the second degree when such person, 6 firm, corporation, dealer, or other entity sells, offers for sale, or 7 gives a flare gun to any person under the age of seventeen. This section 8 shall not apply to sales or transfers to: 9 1. law enforcement agencies; 10 2. members of the armed forces or other governmental personnel acting 11 within the scope of their official duties; or 12 3. persons under seventeen years of age participating in a supervised 13 training program approved by the commissioner of parks, recreation and 14 historic preservation or the division of homeland security and emergency 15 services. 16 Criminal sale of a flare gun in the second degree is a class A misde- 17 meanor. 18 § 265.68 Criminal sale of a flare gun in the first degree. 19 Any person, firm, corporation, dealer, or other entity is guilty of 20 criminal sale of a flare gun in the first degree when such person, firm, 21 corporation, dealer, or other entity sells, offers for sale, or gives a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13467-06-6 S. 8455--B 2 1 flare gun to any person under the age of seventeen and has a previous 2 conviction for criminal sale of a flare gun in the second degree occur- 3 ring within the past two years. 4 Criminal sale of a flare gun in the first degree is a class E felony. 5 § 2. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 399- 6 qqq to read as follows: 7 § 399-qqq. Sale of flare guns; age restriction. 1. No person, firm, 8 corporation, or other business entity shall sell, offer for sale, or 9 distribute any flare gun to a person under the age of seventeen years. 10 2. Prior to the completion of any sale or transfer of a flare gun, the 11 seller shall require the purchaser to present a valid government-issued 12 photo identification verifying that the purchaser is seventeen years of 13 age or older. 14 3. For the purposes of this section, "flare gun" means any handheld 15 signaling device, Very pistol, or signal pistol designed and purposed to 16 fire a pyrotechnic flare, whether single-shot or multi-shot, and whether 17 marketed for maritime, emergency, or recreational use. 18 4. This section shall not apply to sales or transfers to: 19 (a) law enforcement agencies; 20 (b) members of the armed forces or other governmental personnel acting 21 within the scope of their official duties; or 22 (c) persons under seventeen years of age participating in a supervised 23 training program approved by the commissioner of parks, recreation and 24 historic preservation or the division of homeland security and emergency 25 services. 26 5. Any person, firm, or corporation who violates the provisions of 27 this section shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thou- 28 sand dollars. 29 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.